fixer/src/main/resources/el/dictionaries/grc_GR.aff
SET UTF-8
FLAG num
TRY αἀἁάὰᾶἄἂἆἅἃἇᾳᾀᾄᾂᾆᾁᾅᾃᾇβγδεἐἑέὲἔἒἕἓζηἠἡήὴῆἤἢἦἥἣἧῃᾐᾔᾒᾖᾑᾕᾓᾗθιἰἱίὶῖἴἲἶἵἳἷκλμνξοὀὁόὸὄὂὅὃπρῤῥσςτυὐὑύὺῦὔὒὖὕὓὗφχψωὠὡώὼῶὤὢὦὥὣὧῳᾠᾡᾤᾢᾦᾥᾣᾧΑἈἉΆᾺἌἊἎἍἋἏΒΓΔΕἘἙΈῈἜἚΖΗἨἩΉῊἬἪἮἭἫἯΘΙἸἹΊῚἼἺἾἽἻἿΚΛΜΝΞΟὈὉΌῸὌὊὍὋΠΡΣΤΥὙΎῪὝὛὟΦΧΨΩὨὩΏῺὬὪὮὭὫὯ
IGNORE ’
BREAK 2
BREAK -
BREAK ‐
MAP 15
MAP αἀἁάὰᾶἄἂἆἅἃἇᾳᾀᾄᾂᾆᾁᾅᾃᾇ
MAP εἐἑέὲἔἒἕἓ
MAP ηἠἡήὴῆἤἢἦἥἣἧῃᾐᾔᾒᾖᾑᾕᾓᾗ
MAP ιἰἱίὶῖἴἲἶἵἳἷ
MAP οὀὁόὸὄὂὅὃ
MAP ρῤῥ
MAP υὐὑύὺῦὔὒὖὕὓὗ
MAP ωὠὡώὼῶὤὢὦὥὣὧῳᾠᾡᾤᾢᾦᾥᾣᾧ
MAP ΑἈἉΆᾺἌἊἎἍἋἏ
MAP ΕἘἙΈῈἜἚ
MAP ΗἨἩΉῊἬἪἮἭἫἯ
MAP ΙἸἹΊῚἼἺἾἽἻἿ
MAP ΟὈὉΌῸὌὊὍὋ
MAP ΥὙΎῪὝὛὟ
MAP ΩὨὩΏῺὬὪὮὭὫὯ
KEY βρ|ζξῥῤ|ΑΔΛ
REP 2
REP ιι μ
REP μ  ιι
SFX 3401 Y 1
SFX 3401 0 δόν .
SFX 2749 Y 1
SFX 2749 0 νοντές .
SFX 908 Y 1
SFX 908 0 νος .
SFX 1717 Y 1
SFX 1717 0 νου .
SFX 3244 Y 1
SFX 3244 0 ξαί .
SFX 31 Y 1
SFX 31 0 τα .
SFX 84 Y 1
SFX 84 0 τε .
SFX 52 Y 1
SFX 52 0 τι .
SFX 90 Y 1
SFX 90 0 το .
SFX 916 Y 1
SFX 916 0 νός .
SFX 2347 Y 1
SFX 2347 0 σσιν .
SFX 4491 Y 1
SFX 4491 0 σαιέν .
SFX 4594 Y 1
SFX 4594 0 ζηται .
SFX 3446 Y 1
SFX 3446 0 πτον .
SFX 1009 Y 1
SFX 1009 0 σεται .
SFX 2470 Y 1
SFX 2470 0 σθόν .
SFX 4681 Y 1
SFX 4681 0 ῃσί .
SFX 2811 Y 1
SFX 2811 0 ραι .
SFX 2082 Y 1
SFX 2082 0 ραν .
SFX 286 Y 1
SFX 286 0 ντάς .
SFX 1101 Y 1
SFX 1101 0 ους .
SFX 206 Y 1
SFX 206 0 ός .
SFX 2353 Y 1
SFX 2353 0 σθά .
SFX 295 Y 1
SFX 295 0 σθέ .
SFX 3048 Y 1
SFX 3048 0 ξίς .
SFX 4667 Y 1
SFX 4667 0 ῃσι .
SFX 2513 Y 1
SFX 2513 0 δης .
SFX 3903 Y 1
SFX 3903 0 εσσι .
SFX 4090 Y 1
SFX 4090 0 χος .
SFX 2770 Y 1
SFX 2770 0 ζουσάν .
SFX 4225 Y 1
SFX 4225 0 δάς .
SFX 987 Y 1
SFX 987 0 κα .
SFX 935 Y 1
SFX 935 0 κε .
SFX 3588 Y 1
SFX 3588 0 κι .
SFX 2856 Y 1
SFX 2856 0 αντά .
SFX 136 Y 1
SFX 136 0 σαί .
SFX 2193 Y 1
SFX 2193 0 σκον .
SFX 2791 Y 1
SFX 2791 0 στον .
SFX 1949 Y 1
SFX 1949 0 ρια .
SFX 265 Y 1
SFX 265 0 ντός .
SFX 597 Y 1
SFX 597 0 ισίν .
SFX 2606 Y 1
SFX 2606 0 οντάς .
SFX 734 Y 1
SFX 734 0 δος .
SFX 2945 Y 1
SFX 2945 0 ρχος .
SFX 1327 Y 1
SFX 1327 0 σασά .
SFX 454 Y 1
SFX 454 0 σίς .
SFX 1016 Y 1
SFX 1016 0 κά .
SFX 936 Y 1
SFX 936 0 κέ .
SFX 4188 Y 1
SFX 4188 0 κί .
SFX 1453 Y 1
SFX 1453 0 σονταί .
SFX 1887 Y 1
SFX 1887 0 ιεν .
SFX 2175 Y 1
SFX 2175 0 δός .
SFX 2511 Y 1
SFX 2511 0 ζοντος .
SFX 1704 Y 1
SFX 1704 0 τω .
SFX 4445 Y 1
SFX 4445 0 φόν .
SFX 2665 Y 1
SFX 2665 0 ρας .
SFX 1647 Y 1
SFX 1647 0 σωμεν .
SFX 807 Y 1
SFX 807 0 σθ’ .
SFX 4724 Y 1
SFX 4724 0 ναντές .
SFX 4456 Y 1
SFX 4456 0 τητός .
SFX 2607 Y 1
SFX 2607 0 οντός .
SFX 2816 Y 1
SFX 2816 0 οισίν .
SFX 2320 Y 1
SFX 2320 0 θον .
SFX 2436 Y 1
SFX 2436 0 θόν .
SFX 3577 Y 1
SFX 3577 0 νουσάν .
SFX 2262 Y 1
SFX 2262 0 γέ .
SFX 2817 Y 1
SFX 2817 0 οισιν .
SFX 787 Y 1
SFX 787 0 σει .
SFX 386 Y 1
SFX 386 0 σεν .
SFX 1885 Y 1
SFX 1885 0 ινε .
SFX 1985 Y 1
SFX 1985 0 ιοί .
SFX 3412 Y 1
SFX 3412 0 αντας .
SFX 2456 Y 1
SFX 2456 0 ωσιν .
SFX 3224 Y 1
SFX 3224 0 στος .
SFX 3924 Y 1
SFX 3924 0 χέ .
SFX 4805 Y 1
SFX 4805 0 δρον .
SFX 2100 Y 1
SFX 2100 0 εσθαί .
SFX 4722 Y 1
SFX 4722 0 νετέ .
SFX 2430 Y 1
SFX 2430 0 κ’ .
SFX 3990 Y 1
SFX 3990 0 ομαί .
SFX 124 Y 1
SFX 124 0 σα .
SFX 356 Y 1
SFX 356 0 σε .
SFX 20 Y 1
SFX 20 0 σι .
SFX 2158 Y 1
SFX 2158 0 σο .
SFX 294 Y 1
SFX 294 0 αι .
SFX 207 Y 1
SFX 207 0 αν .
SFX 3155 Y 1
SFX 3155 0 λέν .
SFX 3229 Y 1
SFX 3229 0 σεων .
SFX 2705 Y 1
SFX 2705 0 ασά .
SFX 3339 Y 1
SFX 3339 0 σαιμι .
SFX 3804 Y 1
SFX 3804 0 πτόν .
SFX 3953 Y 1
SFX 3953 0 σητέ .
SFX 4920 Y 1
SFX 4920 0 πέ .
SFX 2750 Y 1
SFX 2750 0 νοντες .
SFX 3119 Y 1
SFX 3119 0 σματά .
SFX 1417 Y 1
SFX 1417 0 σασθαί .
SFX 2551 Y 1
SFX 2551 0 ινον .
SFX 3654 Y 1
SFX 3654 0 σεσί .
SFX 4351 Y 1
SFX 4351 0 μων .
SFX 3586 Y 1
SFX 3586 0 μην .
SFX 3864 Y 1
SFX 3864 0 θος .
SFX 4380 Y 1
SFX 4380 0 θου .
SFX 2939 Y 1
SFX 2939 0 σασάν .
SFX 3862 Y 1
SFX 3862 0 ιαί .
SFX 3863 Y 1
SFX 3863 0 θός .
SFX 4526 Y 1
SFX 4526 0 νωσι .
SFX 1878 Y 1
SFX 1878 0 οντες .
SFX 2012 Y 1
SFX 2012 0 νει .
SFX 2246 Y 1
SFX 2246 0 νεν .
SFX 810 Y 1
SFX 810 0 ια .
SFX 1726 Y 1
SFX 1726 0 ιε .
SFX 331 Y 1
SFX 331 0 ιν .
SFX 4980 Y 1
SFX 4980 0 ιο .
SFX 3411 Y 1
SFX 3411 0 αντάς .
SFX 2045 Y 1
SFX 2045 0 ουσίν .
SFX 2766 Y 1
SFX 2766 0 ηται .
SFX 1754 Y 1
SFX 1754 0 μόν .
SFX 3964 Y 1
SFX 3964 0 σαιτό .
SFX 3204 Y 1
SFX 3204 0 χ’ .
SFX 3989 Y 1
SFX 3989 0 ομαι .
SFX 4179 Y 1
SFX 4179 0 μοι .
SFX 1791 Y 1
SFX 1791 0 μον .
SFX 3110 Y 1
SFX 3110 0 τατοι .
SFX 2154 Y 1
SFX 2154 0 τατον .
SFX 4417 Y 1
SFX 4417 0 γμά .
SFX 2743 Y 1
SFX 2743 0 ράν .
SFX 122 Y 1
SFX 122 0 σθαι .
SFX 1506 Y 1
SFX 1506 0 σεσθαι .
SFX 4342 Y 1
SFX 4342 0 νωσιν .
SFX 3490 Y 1
SFX 3490 0 αντός .
SFX 827 Y 1
SFX 827 0 σω .
SFX 169 Y 1
SFX 169 0 ας .
SFX 4295 Y 1
SFX 4295 0 σειαν .
SFX 3178 Y 1
SFX 3178 0 ζοντάς .
SFX 1360 Y 1
SFX 1360 0 σεως .
SFX 804 Y 1
SFX 804 0 οί .
SFX 910 Y 1
SFX 910 0 ίν .
SFX 2819 Y 1
SFX 2819 0 οιό .
SFX 2451 Y 1
SFX 2451 0 γόν .
SFX 4444 Y 1
SFX 4444 0 φον .
SFX 1394 Y 1
SFX 1394 0 σαντος .
SFX 1413 Y 1
SFX 1413 0 σῃς .
SFX 2675 Y 1
SFX 2675 0 νοί .
SFX 1034 Y 1
SFX 1034 0 ρόν .
SFX 4693 Y 1
SFX 4693 0 ουσαί .
SFX 3708 Y 1
SFX 3708 0 ιμι .
SFX 1519 Y 1
SFX 1519 0 νες .
SFX 2755 Y 1
SFX 2755 0 νοις .
SFX 2633 Y 1
SFX 2633 0 θέ .
SFX 1992 Y 1
SFX 1992 0 θί .
SFX 42 Y 1
SFX 42 0 ις .
SFX 2510 Y 1
SFX 2510 0 ζοντός .
SFX 4457 Y 1
SFX 4457 0 τητά .
SFX 4857 Y 1
SFX 4857 0 τητί .
SFX 2403 Y 1
SFX 2403 0 ωσι .
SFX 2534 Y 1
SFX 2534 0 σσέ .
SFX 2657 Y 1
SFX 2657 0 σσί .
SFX 1768 Y 1
SFX 1768 0 ζεσθαί .
SFX 2177 Y 1
SFX 2177 0 γον .
SFX 4157 Y 1
SFX 4157 0 οιν .
SFX 2818 Y 1
SFX 2818 0 οιο .
SFX 1617 Y 1
SFX 1617 0 πέρ .
SFX 909 Y 1
SFX 909 0 ναί .
SFX 4407 Y 1
SFX 4407 0 εσσιν .
SFX 2827 Y 1
SFX 2827 0 μός .
SFX 2828 Y 1
SFX 2828 0 μος .
SFX 2528 Y 1
SFX 2528 0 τατος .
SFX 1359 Y 1
SFX 1359 0 σμα .
SFX 4307 Y 1
SFX 4307 0 ράς .
SFX 426 Y 1
SFX 426 0 αί .
SFX 2855 Y 1
SFX 2855 0 αντα .
SFX 3357 Y 1
SFX 3357 0 νοντάς .
SFX 2325 Y 1
SFX 2325 0 ζουσα .
SFX 1925 Y 1
SFX 1925 0 ζουσι .
SFX 4290 Y 1
SFX 4290 0 σεσιν .
SFX 3362 Y 1
SFX 3362 0 νηται .
SFX 4664 Y 1
SFX 4664 0 σιον .
SFX 3789 Y 1
SFX 3789 0 σειας .
SFX 1886 Y 1
SFX 1886 0 ινέ .
SFX 3340 Y 1
SFX 3340 0 σαιμί .
SFX 1237 Y 1
SFX 1237 0 σαντά .
SFX 2043 Y 1
SFX 2043 0 σαντί .
SFX 2724 Y 1
SFX 2724 0 σκεν .
SFX 857 Y 1
SFX 857 0 ίς .
SFX 4719 Y 1
SFX 4719 0 νετε .
SFX 106 Y 1
SFX 106 0 νται .
SFX 503 Y 1
SFX 503 0 δες .
SFX 1460 Y 1
SFX 1460 0 νθ’ .
SFX 2907 Y 1
SFX 2907 0 ζέν .
SFX 107 Y 1
SFX 107 0 νταί .
SFX 1195 Y 1
SFX 1195 0 ρός .
SFX 3358 Y 1
SFX 3358 0 νοντός .
SFX 2508 Y 1
SFX 2508 0 θε .
SFX 4039 Y 1
SFX 4039 0 θη .
SFX 1919 Y 1
SFX 1919 0 θι .
SFX 2863 Y 1
SFX 2863 0 σσον .
SFX 2616 Y 1
SFX 2616 0 νεσθαί .
SFX 1831 Y 1
SFX 1831 0 ζοντες .
SFX 296 Y 1
SFX 296 0 θ’ .
SFX 2723 Y 1
SFX 2723 0 σκέν .
SFX 4652 Y 1
SFX 4652 0 σσ’ .
SFX 2199 Y 1
SFX 2199 0 ρων .
SFX 814 Y 1
SFX 814 0 οις .
SFX 3952 Y 1
SFX 3952 0 σητε .
SFX 870 Y 1
SFX 870 0 θεν .
SFX 2343 Y 1
SFX 2343 0 σωσιν .
SFX 2413 Y 1
SFX 2413 0 τεραι .
SFX 123 Y 1
SFX 123 0 σθαί .
SFX 2218 Y 1
SFX 2218 0 ζουσίν .
SFX 2369 Y 1
SFX 2369 0 ονταί .
SFX 4748 Y 1
SFX 4748 0 καν .
SFX 3783 Y 1
SFX 3783 0 σιος .
SFX 3582 Y 1
SFX 3582 0 νιόν .
SFX 55 Y 1
SFX 55 0 τές .
SFX 4565 Y 1
SFX 4565 0 ιν’ .
SFX 4096 Y 1
SFX 4096 0 τοιν .
SFX 1971 Y 1
SFX 1971 0 ροι .
SFX 1027 Y 1
SFX 1027 0 ρον .
SFX 3886 Y 1
SFX 3886 0 ζουσαί .
SFX 527 Y 1
SFX 527 0 ισί .
SFX 283 Y 1
SFX 283 0 ντας .
SFX 2463 Y 1
SFX 2463 0 τατα .
SFX 3295 Y 1
SFX 3295 0 ετε .
SFX 4854 Y 1
SFX 4854 0 τητος .
SFX 4527 Y 1
SFX 4527 0 νωσί .
SFX 4807 Y 1
SFX 4807 0 δεις .
SFX 32 Y 1
SFX 32 0 ται .
SFX 3963 Y 1
SFX 3963 0 σαιτο .
SFX 1452 Y 1
SFX 1452 0 σονται .
SFX 830 Y 1
SFX 830 0 νά .
SFX 1424 Y 1
SFX 1424 0 νέ .
SFX 1721 Y 1
SFX 1721 0 νί .
SFX 4847 Y 1
SFX 4847 0 υσαν .
SFX 1805 Y 1
SFX 1805 0 διόν .
SFX 1004 Y 1
SFX 1004 0 κέν .
SFX 4562 Y 1
SFX 4562 0 ινεν .
SFX 2966 Y 1
SFX 2966 0 νουσίν .
SFX 3071 Y 1
SFX 3071 0 θες .
SFX 3123 Y 1
SFX 3123 0 σηται .
SFX 4787 Y 1
SFX 4787 0 ζομαί .
SFX 2704 Y 1
SFX 2704 0 ασα .
SFX 2615 Y 1
SFX 2615 0 νεσθαι .
SFX 1839 Y 1
SFX 1839 0 σομαι .
SFX 4838 Y 1
SFX 4838 0 ψέν .
SFX 4401 Y 1
SFX 4401 0 ζετέ .
SFX 1840 Y 1
SFX 1840 0 σομαί .
SFX 1094 Y 1
SFX 1094 0 ρα .
SFX 1746 Y 1
SFX 1746 0 ρε .
SFX 3539 Y 1
SFX 3539 0 σεσθε .
SFX 1232 Y 1
SFX 1232 0 κας .
SFX 1105 Y 1
SFX 1105 0 ζέ .
SFX 3844 Y 1
SFX 3844 0 μεθά .
SFX 2155 Y 1
SFX 2155 0 τατόν .
SFX 1196 Y 1
SFX 1196 0 ρος .
SFX 1946 Y 1
SFX 1946 0 σειέ .
SFX 25 Y 1
SFX 25 0 μεν .
SFX 4729 Y 1
SFX 4729 0 μενός .
SFX 2065 Y 1
SFX 2065 0 ωι .
SFX 282 Y 1
SFX 282 0 ων .
SFX 999 Y 1
SFX 999 0 ην .
SFX 1239 Y 1
SFX 1239 0 λόν .
SFX 3491 Y 1
SFX 3491 0 αντος .
SFX 43 Y 1
SFX 43 0 τας .
SFX 1816 Y 1
SFX 1816 0 ξαι .
SFX 1752 Y 1
SFX 1752 0 ξαν .
SFX 1845 Y 1
SFX 1845 0 ῃς .
SFX 2541 Y 1
SFX 2541 0 ουσα .
SFX 1711 Y 1
SFX 1711 0 ουσι .
SFX 2099 Y 1
SFX 2099 0 εσθαι .
SFX 2896 Y 1
SFX 2896 0 λοι .
SFX 1201 Y 1
SFX 1201 0 λον .
SFX 4872 Y 1
SFX 4872 0 σσέν .
SFX 3679 Y 1
SFX 3679 0 οιτό .
SFX 2247 Y 1
SFX 2247 0 νειν .
SFX 1298 Y 1
SFX 1298 0 ν’ .
SFX 2076 Y 1
SFX 2076 0 τερά .
SFX 991 Y 1
SFX 991 0 σαντες .
SFX 2973 Y 1
SFX 2973 0 κές .
SFX 3957 Y 1
SFX 3957 0 σασίν .
SFX 2394 Y 1
SFX 2394 0 ζονταί .
SFX 3355 Y 1
SFX 3355 0 νῃς .
SFX 1723 Y 1
SFX 1723 0 ιτο .
SFX 125 Y 1
SFX 125 0 σά .
SFX 361 Y 1
SFX 361 0 σέ .
SFX 22 Y 1
SFX 22 0 σί .
SFX 2164 Y 1
SFX 2164 0 σό .
SFX 2224 Y 1
SFX 2224 0 εταί .
SFX 653 Y 1
SFX 653 0 οι .
SFX 246 Y 1
SFX 246 0 ον .
SFX 4070 Y 1
SFX 4070 0 βόν .
SFX 2542 Y 1
SFX 2542 0 ουσά .
SFX 1713 Y 1
SFX 1713 0 ουσί .
SFX 4625 Y 1
SFX 4625 0 ψαι .
SFX 3625 Y 1
SFX 3625 0 ψαν .
SFX 4069 Y 1
SFX 4069 0 βον .
SFX 2376 Y 1
SFX 2376 0 ξιν .
SFX 1236 Y 1
SFX 1236 0 σαντα .
SFX 2041 Y 1
SFX 2041 0 σαντι .
SFX 4180 Y 1
SFX 4180 0 μοί .
SFX 2915 Y 1
SFX 2915 0 γεν .
SFX 4315 Y 1
SFX 4315 0 πόν .
SFX 2527 Y 1
SFX 2527 0 τατός .
SFX 1751 Y 1
SFX 1751 0 ξέν .
SFX 1684 Y 1
SFX 1684 0 σειέν .
SFX 2081 Y 1
SFX 2081 0 ροί .
SFX 2888 Y 1
SFX 2888 0 μες .
SFX 2529 Y 1
SFX 2529 0 στα .
SFX 4260 Y 1
SFX 4260 0 στο .
SFX 2792 Y 1
SFX 2792 0 στόν .
SFX 1293 Y 1
SFX 1293 0 αις .
SFX 203 Y 1
SFX 203 0 μαί .
SFX 1431 Y 1
SFX 1431 0 ως .
SFX 1012 Y 1
SFX 1012 0 ης .
SFX 1915 Y 1
SFX 1915 0 λός .
SFX 1942 Y 1
SFX 1942 0 σουσιν .
SFX 3547 Y 1
SFX 3547 0 σασαί .
SFX 1815 Y 1
SFX 1815 0 ξας .
SFX 2335 Y 1
SFX 2335 0 ωμέν .
SFX 1755 Y 1
SFX 1755 0 λος .
SFX 1645 Y 1
SFX 1645 0 τερόν .
SFX 4400 Y 1
SFX 4400 0 ζετε .
SFX 3836 Y 1
SFX 3836 0 νεις .
SFX 1484 Y 1
SFX 1484 0 νῃ .
SFX 4003 Y 1
SFX 4003 0 νῳ .
SFX 2007 Y 1
SFX 2007 0 σατέ .
SFX 3545 Y 1
SFX 3545 0 σατό .
SFX 385 Y 1
SFX 385 0 σέν .
SFX 1523 Y 1
SFX 1523 0 ματα .
SFX 2891 Y 1
SFX 2891 0 ματι .
SFX 1869 Y 1
SFX 1869 0 σκε .
SFX 2469 Y 1
SFX 2469 0 σθον .
SFX 1337 Y 1
SFX 1337 0 ειν .
SFX 2822 Y 1
SFX 2822 0 νουσα .
SFX 2821 Y 1
SFX 2821 0 νουσι .
SFX 276 Y 1
SFX 276 0 σ’ .
SFX 4919 Y 1
SFX 4919 0 πε .
SFX 188 Y 1
SFX 188 0 ος .
SFX 643 Y 1
SFX 643 0 ου .
SFX 4873 Y 1
SFX 4873 0 σσεν .
SFX 1409 Y 1
SFX 1409 0 ζων .
SFX 3546 Y 1
SFX 3546 0 σασαι .
SFX 2940 Y 1
SFX 2940 0 σασαν .
SFX 3049 Y 1
SFX 3049 0 ξις .
SFX 2677 Y 1
SFX 2677 0 μασί .
SFX 3661 Y 1
SFX 3661 0 ραί .
SFX 3893 Y 1
SFX 3893 0 ζομεν .
SFX 2851 Y 1
SFX 2851 0 ζῃ .
SFX 2753 Y 1
SFX 2753 0 νονταί .
SFX 4416 Y 1
SFX 4416 0 δά .
SFX 1832 Y 1
SFX 1832 0 δέ .
SFX 2702 Y 1
SFX 2702 0 δί .
SFX 1767 Y 1
SFX 1767 0 ζεσθαι .
SFX 2208 Y 1
SFX 2208 0 λά .
SFX 2131 Y 1
SFX 2131 0 λέ .
SFX 3223 Y 1
SFX 3223 0 στός .
SFX 228 Y 1
SFX 228 0 ντα .
SFX 2820 Y 1
SFX 2820 0 ντε .
SFX 314 Y 1
SFX 314 0 ντι .
SFX 180 Y 1
SFX 180 0 ντο .
SFX 3505 Y 1
SFX 3505 0 ψε .
SFX 1098 Y 1
SFX 1098 0 ζε .
SFX 2243 Y 1
SFX 2243 0 οντά .
SFX 3044 Y 1
SFX 3044 0 οντί .
SFX 1279 Y 1
SFX 1279 0 ζον .
SFX 3958 Y 1
SFX 3958 0 σασιν .
SFX 602 Y 1
SFX 602 0 τόν .
SFX 2810 Y 1
SFX 2810 0 ρεν .
SFX 1837 Y 1
SFX 1837 0 τερός .
SFX 199 Y 1
SFX 199 0 ά .
SFX 133 Y 1
SFX 133 0 έ .
SFX 5 Y 1
SFX 5 0 ί .
SFX 298 Y 1
SFX 298 0 ό .
SFX 2221 Y 1
SFX 2221 0 ζόν .
SFX 431 Y 1
SFX 431 0 ισι .
SFX 3718 Y 1
SFX 3718 0 ιαι .
SFX 3389 Y 1
SFX 3389 0 ιαν .
SFX 1336 Y 1
SFX 1336 0 εις .
SFX 2965 Y 1
SFX 2965 0 ξα .
SFX 1691 Y 1
SFX 1691 0 ξε .
SFX 858 Y 1
SFX 858 0 σῃ .
